North Dakota statutes. TITLE 39 Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 39-28 Motorcycle Safety Education

39-28-01.
Additional fees for motorized bicycle and motorcycle registration.

In addition to the fees required by section 39-04-19 for motorized bicycle and motorcycle registration, a motorcycle safety education fee of ten dollars is required at the time of registration of each motorized bicycle and motorcycle.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 442, § 1; 1983, ch. 414, § 5; 2005, ch. 343, § 1.

39-28-02.
Director to establish standards for motorcycle safety courses.

The director shall establish requirements for instructional standards, course approval, and teacher certification standards for motorcycle safety courses required by this chapter. Motorcycle safety courses may be offered by public schools and by approved organizations which meet instruction, course, and teacher certification requirements. The director may adopt rules governing the operation of motorcycle safety courses, administer moneys pursuant to this chapter, conduct audits and otherwise examine the records and accounts of approved motorcycle safety courses, and require other information as may be necessary to monitor the quality of motorcycle safety courses.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 442, § 2; 1991, ch. 437, § 1.

39-28-03.
Reimbursement for motorcycle safety courses.

The director shall reimburse public schools and organizations offering approved motorcycle safety courses for the actual cost of the courses. The amount of reimbursement for each student may not exceed the actual per-pupil cost for the motorcycle safety program.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 442, § 3; 1991, ch. 437, § 2.

39-28-04.
Motorcycle safety promotion.

The director, in cooperation with other state agencies, shall promote safety and awareness in the use and operation of motorcycles through advertising and other appropriate means, as provided by this chapter. The general public may provide input to improve motorcycle safety and education.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 442, § 4.

39-28-05.
Disposition of fees.

Any fee collected pursuant to this chapter must be deposited by the director with the state treasurer and credited to a special motorcycle safety education fund in the state treasury.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 442, § 5.